pl: Liczba otworów na palce: Na 2 palce; Na 3 palce; Na 4 palce; Bez otworów na palce; Inne
lt-LT: Pirštų angų skaičius: 2 skylių; 3 skylių; 4 skylių; Be skylių pirštams; Kita
en: Finger hole count: 2-hole; 3-hole; 4-hole; Fingerless; Other
nb: Antall fingerhull: 2-hulls; 3-hulls; 4-hulls; Fingerløs; Annet
fi: Sormireikien määrä: 2-reikäinen; 3-reikäinen; 4-reikäinen; Sormeton; Muu
zh-CN: 指孔数量: 2 孔; 3 孔; 4 孔; 无指; 其他
hu: Ujjlyukak száma: 2 lyukú; 3 lyukú; 4 lyukú; Ujjatlan; Egyéb
sl-SI: Število lukenj za prste: 2 luknji; 3 luknje; 4 luknje; Brez lukenj; Drugo
da: Antal fingerhuller: 2 huller; 3 huller; 4 huller; Uden fingre; Andet
vi: Số lượng lỗ ngón tay: 2 lỗ; 3 lỗ; 4 lỗ; Không xỏ ngón; Khác
de: Anzahl der Fingerlöcher: 2-Loch; 3-Loch; 4-Loch; Fingerlos; Sonstige
sv: Antal fingerhål: 2-håls; 3-håls; 4-håls; Fingerlösa; Övrigt
it: Conteggio dei fori per le dita: 2 fori; 3 fori; 4 fori; Senza dita; Altro
ja: 指穴の数: 2つ穴; 3つ穴; 4つ穴; フィンガーレス; その他
es: Cantidad de orificios para los dedos: 2 agujeros; 3 agujeros; 4 agujeros; Sin dedos; Otro
ru: Количество отверстий для пальцев: 2 отверстия; 3 отверстия; 4 отверстия; Без отверстий для пальцев; Другое
ro-RO: Numărul de găuri pentru degete: Cu 2 orificii; Cu 3 orificii; Cu 4 orificii; Fără degete; Altele
fr: Nombre de trous de doigts: 2 trous; 3 trous; 4 trous; Sans trou; Autre
pt-PT: contagem de orifícios para os dedos: 2 orifícios; 3 orifícios; 4 orifícios; Sem dedos; Outro
el: Αριθμός οπών δακτύλου: 2 οπών; 3 οπών; 4 οπών; Χωρίς δάχτυλα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Broj rupica za prste: 2 rupe; 3 rupe; 4 rupe; Bez prstiju; Ostalo
bg-BG: Брой дупки за пръсти: С 2 отвора; С 3 отвора; С 4 отвора; Без пръсти; Други
tr: Parmak deliği sayısı: 2 delikli; 3 delikli; 4 delikli; Parmaksız; Diğer
ko: 손가락 구멍 개수: 2홀; 3홀; 4홀; 핑거리스; 기타
nl: Vingergat aantal: 2 gaten; 3 gaten; 4 gaten; Vingerloos; Overige
zh-TW: 指孔數: 2 孔; 3 孔; 4 孔; 無孔; 其他
th: จำนวนรูนิ้ว: 2 รู; 3 รู; 4 รู; ไม่มีนิ้ว; อื่นๆ
cs: Počet otvorů pro prsty: 2 otvory; 3 otvory; 4 otvory; Bez otvorů; Jiné
pt-BR: Contagem de orifícios para os dedos: 2 furos; 3 furos; 4 furos; Sem dedos; Outros
sk-SK: Počet otvorov na prsty: S 2 otvormi; S 3 otvormi; S 4 otvormi; Bez prstov; Iné